Washington statutes.
RCW 36.79.901

Effective date—1983 1st ex.s. c 49.

This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect on July 1, 1983.

[ 1983 1st ex.s. c 49 s 33.]